Utah statutes.
24-1-20.   State Law Enforcement Forfeiture Account created -- Revenue sources -- Use of account designated.

(1) (a)  There is created in the General Fund a restricted account called the State Law Enforcement Forfeiture Account.

(b)  All money awarded to the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Corrections, or any division or agency within either department, through the Crime Reduction Assistance Program created in Section 24-1-19 shall be deposited into the State Law Enforcement Forfeiture Account.

(c)  All money previously deposited, or currently held in the Drug Forfeiture Account created in Section 58-37-20, and that was in that account when it was repealed by Initiative B, which passed in 2000, and which became effective March 29, 2001, shall be transferred to and deposited in the State Law Enforcement Forfeiture Account created in this Subsection (1).

(2)  The Department of Public Safety and the Department of Corrections may expend amounts as appropriated by the Legislature from the State Law Enforcement Forfeiture Account for law enforcement purposes or controlled substance law enforcement purposes as specified in Section 24-1-19.

(3)  That portion of funds forfeited or that are required to be disbursed to other governmental entities under existing contractual agreements or Utah statutory requirements are exempt from this section.

(4)  Funds forfeited as a result of the Salt Lake Airport Drug Program operated by the Department of Public Safety, not to exceed the Department of Public Safety's expenditure to that program, are exempt from this section.

(5)  The Department of Public Safety and the Department of Corrections, as part of the annual legislative budget hearings, shall provide to the legislative Executive Offices and Criminal Justice Appropriations Subcommittee a complete accounting of expenditures and revenues from the funds received under this section.

(6)  The Legislature may annually provide, in an appropriations act, legislative direction for anticipated expenditures of the money received under this section.

